en: Hockey equipment included: Athletic cup; Chest protector; Goalie blocker; Goalie catcher; Goalie mask; Goalie pads; Skates; Stick; Other
nb: Hockeyutstyr inkludert: Susp; Brystbeskyttere; Keeperblokkerer; Keeperfanger; Keepermaske; Keeperputer; Skøyter; Pinne; Annet
fr: Équipement de hockey inclus: Coupe d’athlétisme; Plastron; Bloqueur de gardien de but; receveur de gardien de but; Masque de gardien de but; Jambières de gardien de but; Patins; Bâton; Autre
it: Attrezzatura da hockey inclusa: Coppa di protettiva; Protezione per il torace; Bloccante per portiere; Ricevitore per portiere; Maschera da portiere; Paracolpi per portiere; Pattini; Stick; Altro
ja: ホッケー用品を含む: アスレチックカップ; 胸部プロテクター; ゴールキーパーブロッカー; ゴールキーパーキャッチャー; ゴールキーパーマスク; ゴールキーパーパッド; スケート; スティック; その他
pl: Sprzęt do hokeja w zestawie: Puchar sportowy; Ochraniacz klatki piersiowej; Blokada bramki; Łapacz bramek; Maska bramkarza; Podkładki bramkarskie; Łyżwy; Przypnij; Inne
da: Hockeyudstyr medfølger: Skridtbeskytter til sport; Brystbeskytter; Målmandsblokering; Målmandsgriber; Målmandsmaske; Målmandspuder; Skøjter; Pind; Andet
es: Equipo hockey incluido: Copa atlética; Protector de pecho; Bloqueador de portero; Atrapador de portero; Máscara de portero; Almohadillas de portero; Patines; Palillo; Otros
zh-TW: 包括曲棍球裝備: 護襠; 護胸; 守門手擋; 守門手套; 守門面具; 守門腳擋; 溜冰鞋; 棒狀; 其他
zh-CN: 包含曲棍球装备: 运动奖杯; 护胸; 守门员阻挡器; 守门员手套; 守门员面具; 守门员护腿板; 冰鞋; 棒/棍/签; 其他
fi: Mukana jääkiekkovarusteet: Alasuojat; Rintakehäsuoja; Jääkiekkomaalivahdin kilpi; Jääkiekkomaalivahdin räpylä; Jääkiekkomaalivahdin kypärä; Jääkiekkomaalivahdin patjat; Luistimet; Tikku; Muu
ro-RO: Echipament de hochei inclus: Protecții pentru organele genitale; Protecții pentru piept; Mănuși respins; Mănuși prins; Mască pentru portar; Apărători portar; Patine; Tijă; Altele
sv: Hockeyutrustning som ingår: Cuper för sporter; Bröstskydd; Målvaktsblockerare; Målvaktsfångare; Målvaktsmask; Målvaktsskydd; Skridskor; Stift; Övrigt
cs: Obsažené hokejové vybavení: Suspenzor na atletiku; Chránič hrudníku; Brankářská vyrážečka; Brankářská lapačka; Brankářská maska; Brankářské chrániče; Brusle; Tyčinka; Jiné
pt-BR: Equipamento de hóquei incluído: Taça Atlética; Protetores de peito; Bloqueador de goleiro; Apanhador de goleiros; Máscara de goleiro; Protetores de goleiro; Patins; Vareta; Outro
vi: Bao gồm thiết bị khúc côn cầu: Thiết bị bảo vệ vùng kín khi chơi thể thao; Đồ bảo vệ ngực; Găng tay chặn của thủ môn; Găng tay bắt bóng của thủ môn; Mặt nạ thủ môn; Tấm đệm thủ môn; Giày trượt; Nén; Khác
lt-LT: Į komplektą įtraukta ritulio įranga: Kapšelio apsauga; Krūtinės apsauga; Vartininko blokeris; Vartininko pirštinė; Vartininko kaukė; Vartininko apsaugos; Pačiūžos; Lazda; Kita
bg-BG: Включено оборудване за хокей: Спортна купа; Протектор за гърди; Блокиращо устройство за вратари; Ръкавица за вратар; Маска за вратар; Подложки за вратар; Кънки; Стик; Други
sk-SK: Hokejové vybavenie zahrnuté v cene: Suspenzor; Chránič hrudníka; Brankárska vyrážačka; Brankárska lapačka; Brankárska maska; Brankárske chrániče; Korčule; Tyčinka; Iné
tr: Hokey ekipmanları dahil: Sporcu kasık koruyucu; Göğüslük; Kaleci engelleyici; Kaleci yakalayıcı; Kaleci maskesi; Kaleci dizliği; Paten; Sap; Diğer
el: Περιλαμβάνεται εξοπλισμός χόκεϊ: Αθλητικό κύπελλο; Προστατευτικό στήθους; Μπλόκερ τερματοφύλακα; Κάτσερ τερματοφύλακα; Μάσκα τερματοφύλακα; Επιθέματα τερματοφύλακα; Παγοπέδιλα; Στικ; Άλλο
de: Hockeyausrüstung inklusive: Suspensorien für Athleten; Brustschutz; Torwartblocker; Torwartfanghandschuh; Torwartmaske; Torwartpolster; Rollschuhe; Stick; Sonstiges
ko: 하키 장비 포함: 낭심 보호대; 가슴 보호 장비; 골키퍼 블로커; 골키퍼 캐처; 골키퍼 마스크; 골키퍼 패드; 스케이트; 막대; 기타
hr-HR: Uključena oprema za hokej: Štitnik za genitalije; Štitnik za prsa; Golmanski bloker; Golmanska rukavica; Golmanska maska; Golmanski jastučići; Klizaljke; Palica; Ostalo
nl: Hockeyuitrusting inbegrepen: Kruisbeschermer voor atletiek; Borstbeschermer; Keepersblokker; Keepersvanger; Keepersmasker; Keepersbeschermers; Schaatsen; Stick; Andere
th: รวมอุปกรณ์ฮอกกี้: กระจับ; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันส่วนอก; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันแขนของผู้รักษาประตู; ถุงมือผู้รักษาประตู; หน้ากากป้องกันผู้รักษาประตู; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันขาของผู้รักษาประตู; รองเท้าสเก็ต; แท่ง; อื่นๆ
ru: Состав набора инвентаря для хоккея: Защита паха; Защита груди; Блокер вратаря; Кэтчер вратаря; Маска вратаря; Щитки вратаря; Коньки; Клюшка; Другое
sl-SI: Priložena hokejska oprema: Športni pokal; Ščitnik za prsi; Vratarski bloker; Vratarski lovilec; Vratarska maska; Vratarski ščitniki; Drsalke; Palica; Drugo
hu: A tartalmazott jégkorong-felszerelés: Atlétikai szuszpenzor; Mellkasvédő; Kapus blokkolókesztyű; Kapus elkapókesztyű; Kapus maszk; Kapus védőeszközök; Korcsolyák; Bot; Egyéb
pt-PT: Equipamento de hóquei incluído: Coquilha para desporto; Protetor de peito; Proteção para guarda-redes; Apanhador para guarda-redes; Máscara para guarda-redes; Protetores para guarda-redes; Patins; Taco; Outro